Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There are appropriated to the Secretary of State, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following purposes:
(1) Administrative Services
Division..................................... $ 3,968,263
(2) Elections Division ..................... $ 10,415,758
(3) Elections Division,
distributions to counties ........... $ 879,425
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Secretary of State, for
the following purposes:
(1) Administrative Services
Division..................................... $ 26,059,329
(2) Elections Division ..................... $ 1,249,875
(3) Audits Division.......................... $ 26,163,541
(4) Archives Division ...................... $ 9,373,886
(5) Corporation Division................. $ 13,463,179
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$5,892,838 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Secretary of State.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5538 (SB 5538-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 16, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 22, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5538 (SB 5538-A) Page 2